hr-HR: Materijal žica reketa: Kevlar; Najlon; Poliamid (PA); Poliester; Poliolefin; Poliuretan (PU); Vectran; Ostalo
zh-CN: 球拍线材质: Kevlar; 尼龙; 聚酰胺 (PA); 聚酯纤维; 聚烯烃; 聚氨酯 (PU); Vectran; 其他
ko: 라켓 줄 소재: Kevlar; 나일론; 폴리아미드(PA); 폴리에스테르; 폴리올레핀; 폴리우레탄(PU); Vectran; 기타
ja: ラケットストリング材質: Kevlar; ナイロン; ポリアミド (PA); ポリエステル; ポリオレフィン; ポリウレタン (PU); Vectran; その他
de: Schlägersaitenmaterial: Kevlar; Nylon; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyolefin; Polyurethan (PU); Vectran; Sonstiges
fi: Mailan jänteen materiaali: Kevlar; Nailon; Polyamidi (PA); Polyesteri; Polyolefiini; Polyuretaani (PU); Vectran; Muu
el: Υλικό χορδής ρακέτας: Kevlar; Νάιλον; Πολυαμίδιο (PA); Πολυεστέρας; Πολυολεφίνη; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Vectran; Άλλο
sv: Racketsträng - material: Kevlar; Nylon; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyolefin; Polyuretan (PU); Vectran; Övrigt
ru: Материал струн ракетки: Кевлар; Нейлон; Полиамид (ПА); Полиэстер; Полиолефин; Полиуретан (ПУ); Вектран; Другое
pl: Materiał naciągu do rakiet: Kevlar; Nylon; Poliamid (PA); Poliester; Poliolefin; Poliuretan (PU); Vectran; Inne
lt-LT: Raketės stygų medžiaga: Kevlaras; Nailonas; Poliamidas (PA); Poliesteris; Poliolefinas; Poliuretanas (PU); Vektranas; Kita
sl-SI: Material strune za lopar: Kevlar; Najlon; Poliamid (PA); Poliester; Poliolefin; Poliuretan (PU); Vectran; Drugo
nb: Racketstrengmateriale: Kevlar; Nylon; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyolefin; Polyuretan (PU); Vectran; Annet
hu: Ütőhúr anyaga: Kevlár; Nejlon; Poliamid (PA); Poliészter; Poliolefin; Poliuretán (PU); Vectran; Egyéb
it: Materiale delle corde della racchetta: Kevlar; Nylon; Poliammide (PA); Poliestere; Poliolefina; Poliuretano (PU); Vectran; Altro
en: Racket string material: Kevlar; Nylon; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polyolefin; Polyurethane (PU); Vectran; Other
ro-RO: Material corzi rachetă: Kevlar; Nailon; Poliamidă (PA); Poliester; Poliolefină; Poliuretan (PU); Vectran; Altele
fr: Matériau du cordage de la raquette: Kevlar; Nylon; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polyoléfine; Polyuréthane (PU); Vectran; Autre
vi: Vật liệu cước đan vợt: Kevlar; Nylon; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polyolefin; Polyurethane (PU); Vectran; Khác
da: Materiale til ketsjerstrenge: Kevlar; Nylon; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyolefin; Polyurethan (PU); Vectran; Andet
zh-TW: 球拍纏繩材質: Kevlar; 尼龍; 聚醯胺 (PA); 聚酯; 聚烯烴; 聚氨酯 (PU); Vectran; 其他
es: Material de las cuerdas de la raqueta: Kevlar; Nylon; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster; Poliolefina; Poliuretano (PU); Vectran; Otros
bg-BG: Материал на кордата на ракетата: Кевлар; Найлон; Полиамид (PA); Полиестер; Полиолефин; Полиуретан (PU); Вектран; Други
nl: Materiaal racketsnaar: Kevlar; Nylon; Polyamide (PA); Polyester; Polyolefine; Polyurethaan (PU); Vectran; Andere
sk-SK: Materiál výpletu rakety: Kevlar; Nylon; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyolefín; Polyuretán (PU); Vectran; Iné
cs: Materiál výpletu rakety: Kevlar; Nylon; Polyamid (PA); Polyester; Polyolefin; Polyuretan (PU); Vectran; Jiné
pt-BR: Material de corda de raquete: Kevlar; Nylon; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster; Poliolefina; Poliuretano (PU); Vectran; Outro
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเอ็นไม้แร็กเก็ต: Kevlar; ไนลอน; โพลิอะไมด์ (PA); โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิโอเลฟิน; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); Vectran; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Material das cordas da raquete: Kevlar; Náilon; Poliamida (PA); Poliéster; Poliolefina; Poliuretano (PU); Vectran; Outro
tr: Raket ipi malzemesi: Kevlar; Plastik; Poliamid (PA); Poliyester; Poliolefin; Poliüretan (PU); Vectran; Diğer